Utah statutes.
26-8b-301.   Reporting location of automatic external defibrillators.
(1)  Beginning on September 1, 2009, in accordance with Subsection (2) and
except as provided in Subsection (3):
(a)  a person who owns or leases an AED shall report the person's name,
address, and telephone number, and the exact location of the AED, in writing,
to the emergency medical dispatch center that provides emergency dispatch
services for the location where the AED is installed, if the person:
(i)  installs the AED;
(ii)  causes the AED to be installed; or
(iii)  allows the AED to be installed; and
(b)  a person who owns or leases an AED that is removed from a location where
it is installed shall report the person's name, address, and telephone number,
and the exact location from which the AED is removed, in writing, to the
emergency medical dispatch center that provides emergency dispatch services
for the location from which the AED is removed, if the person:
(i)  removes the AED;
(ii)  causes the AED to be removed; or
(iii)  allows the AED to be removed.
(2)  A report required under Subsection (1) shall be made within 30 days after
the day on which the AED is installed or removed.
(3)  Subsection (1) does not apply to an AED that is installed in, or removed
from, a private residence.
(4)  Beginning on September 1, 2009, a person who owns or leases an AED that
is installed in, or removed from, a private residence may voluntarily report
the location of, or removal of, the AED to the emergency medical dispatch
center that provides emergency dispatch services for the location where the
private residence is located.
(5)  The department may not impose a penalty on a person for failing to comply
with the requirements of this section.
